test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-AND-kawiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kâwiy - ok : # -m dep. animate noun, mother, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 140

     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikâwiy
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikâwiy
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwiya
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwiyiwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikâwinân
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikâwinaw
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikâwiwâw
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwiwâwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwiyiwa

     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikâwiyak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikâwiyak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwiya
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwiyiwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikâwinânak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikâwinawak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikâwiwâwak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwiwâwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwiyiwa

     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikâwisis
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikâwisis
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwisisa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikâwisisinân
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikâwisisinaw
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikâwisisiwâw
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwisisiwâwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa

     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikâwisisak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikâwisisak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okâwisisa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikâwisisinânak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikâwisisinawak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikâwisisiwâwak
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okâwisisiwâwa
     -kâwiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: okâwisisiyiwa
